en: Brake caliper bleeder screw position: Rear; front; Other
it: Posizione della vite di spurgo della pinza freno: Posteriore; Anteriore; Altro
es: Posición del tornillo de purga de la pinza de freno: Trasero; Delantero; Otro
da: Placering af udluftningsskrue på bremsekaliberen: Bagpå; Foran; Andet
de: Position der Entlüftungsschraube am Bremssattel: Hinten; Vorne; Sonstige
nl: Remklauw ontluchtingsschroef positie: Achter; Voor; Overig
th: ตำแหน่งสกรูไล่ลมคาลิเปอร์เบรก: ด้านหลัง; ด้านหน้า; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Posição do parafuso de sangria da pinça de freio: Traseira; Dianteira; Outro
sv: Bromsokets luftningsskruvs position: Bak; Fram; Övrigt
bg-BG: Позиция на винта за обезвъздушаване на спирачния апарат: Задна; Предна; Други
nb: Plassering av bremsekaliperens lufteskrue: Bak; Foran; Annet
ko: 브레이크 캘리퍼 블리더 스크루 위치: 후면; 전면; 기타
zh-TW: 煞車卡鉗排氣螺絲位置: 後; 前; 其他
pl: Położenie śruby odpowietrzającej zacisku hamulcowego: Tył; Przód; Inne
fi: Jarrusatulan ilmausruuvin asento: Taka; Etu; Muu
ru: Расположение штуцера прокачки суппорта: Сзади; Спереди; Другое
sk-SK: Poloha odvzdušňovacej skrutky brzdového strmeňa: Zadná; Predná; Iná
vi: Vị trí vít xả khí kẹp phanh: Phía sau; Phía trước; Khác
pt-PT: Posição do parafuso de purga da pinça de travão: Traseira; Frente; Outro
lt-LT: Stabdžių suporto nuorinimo varžto padėtis: Galinė; Priekinė; Kita
ro-RO: Poziția șurubului de aerisire a etrierului de frână: Spate; Față; Altele
sl-SI: Položaj vijaka za odzračevanje zavorne čeljusti: Zadaj; Spredaj; Drugo
zh-CN: 制动卡钳放气螺丝位置: 后部; 前部; 其他
tr: Fren kaliperi hava alma vidası konumu: Arka; Ön; Diğer
el: Θέση βίδας εξαέρωσης δαγκάνας φρένων: Πίσω; Εμπρός; Άλλο
cs: Poloha odvzdušňovacího šroubu brzdového třmenu: Zadní; Přední; Jiné
fr: Position de la vis de purge de l’étrier de frein: Arrière; Avant; Autre
ja: ブレーキキャリパーのブリーダーネジの位置: リア; フロント; その他
hr-HR: Položaj vijka za odzračivanje kočione čeljusti: Straga; Sprijeda; Ostalo
hu: Féknyereg légtelenítőcsavarjának helye: Hátsó; Elülső; Egyéb